Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 4 Tennessee Prepaid Funeral Benefits Act
62-5-411. Maintenance of accounts, books and records — Annual examination of pre-need sellers and sales agents.

Every pre-need seller shall keep and maintain, at a minimum, accurate accounts, books, and records in this state of all pre-need funeral contract and prearrangement insurance policy transactions, copies of all agreements, insurance policies, instruments of assignment, the dates and amounts of payments made and accepted thereon, the names and addresses of the pre-need funeral contract purchasers, the names and addresses of the pre-need funeral contract beneficiaries, the names of the trustees holding pre-need funeral trust funds, copies of the trustee's regular valuations of assets required in § 62-5-408, and the names of insurance companies issuing prearrangement insurance policies. The records shall be kept for a minimum of five (5) years after the death of the pre-need funeral contract beneficiary.

The commissioner may investigate or examine the affairs of any pre-need seller or pre-need sales agent whenever it is deemed appropriate to do so. However, the commissioner shall require an annual examination to ensure that each person, firm, or corporation promising to pay or arrange for funeral services under this part will be able to perform its contract with the purchaser.

The pre-need seller shall pay all costs of any examination conducted under subsection (b), including, but not limited to, the reasonable fees of actuaries, accountants, attorneys and other professionals with whom the commissioner may enter into a contract to perform examination services on behalf of the commissioner.

Trustees of pre-need funeral trusts shall disclose to the commissioner any information regarding pre-need funeral trust accounts overseen by the trustee.

A certified public accountant acting as a trustee pursuant to § 62-5-403(15)(B) shall submit proof of errors and omissions liability coverage with each trustee report to be filed with the commissioner.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 12; 2008, ch. 857, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Section 62-5-403(15)(B), referred to in this section, concerning a definition of trustee, expires on July 1, 2011, pursuant to Acts 2008, ch. 857, § 1, effective July 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-412. Transfer of registration.

A pre-need seller registration may be transferred to a new owner upon payment of a fee fixed by the commissioner and upon submission of an audit report prepared and signed by an independent certified public accountant licensed in this state. All the fees and expenses in connection with the audit are not the responsibility of the trustee or the trust. The audit report shall include an unqualified opinion on the accuracy of the trust fund balances and a report of compliance with this part. Shortages in the trust funds shall be funded by the pre-need seller or new owner prior to a transfer of registration.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-413. Administration of part by commissioner — Civil penalties.

The commissioner shall administer this part.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the intent of this part in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner shall collect a fee for the registration of any person, association, partnership, firm or corporation engaged in selling any agreement, contract or plan permitted under this part.

The commissioner may deny an application for a registration, or may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew any registration under this part upon finding that the registrant or applicant has:

Violated this part, or any rule promulgated under this part;

Practiced fraud, deceit or misrepresentation;

Knowingly and willfully made a material misstatement in connection with an application for registration;

Been convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of any felony, if the commissioner finds that the conviction reflects unfavorably on the fitness for the registration;

Engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to defraud, deceive or harm the public;

Violated any disciplinary order of the commissioner; or

Failed or refused to cooperate with any audit, inspection or investigation to determine compliance with this part or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part.

In addition to or in lieu of any lawful disciplinary action under this part, the commissioner may, at the commissioner's discretion, assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each separate violation of this part, or any rule or regulation promulgated under this part. Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate violation.

The commissioner is authorized to assess a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) against the trustee of a pre-need trust fund required by this part, for each separate violation of this part, or of any rule or regulation promulgated under this part. Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate violation.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-414. Appointment of receiver — Jurisdiction of court — Other legal remedies — Plan for reorganization, consolidation, conversion, merger or other transformation — Pre-need funeral consumer protection account — Pre-need funeral consumer protection fee.

The Davidson County chancery court, upon the petition of the commissioner, may appoint the commissioner as receiver to take charge of, control and manage a pre-need seller upon one (1) or more of the following grounds:

The pre-need seller has not maintained trust funds received from contracts in the manner required by this part;

The pre-need seller has allowed its registration to lapse, or the registration has been revoked;

The pre-need seller is impaired or insolvent;

The pre-need seller has refused to submit its books, records, accounts, or affairs to examination by the commissioner;

There is reasonable cause to believe that there has been embezzlement, misappropriation, or other wrongful misapplication or use of trust funds or fraud affecting the ability of the pre-need seller to perform its obligations under pre-need funeral contracts sold or assumed by the pre-need seller;

The pre-need seller has failed to file its annual report; or

The pre-need seller cannot or will not be able to meet all of its contractual obligations when they come due.

For the purpose of this section, Davidson County chancery court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters brought under this section, and that court is authorized to make all necessary or appropriate orders to carry out the purposes of this part.

Receivership proceedings instituted pursuant to this part shall constitute the sole and exclusive method of liquidating, rehabilitating, or conserving a pre-need seller, and no court shall entertain a petition for the commencement of the proceedings unless the petition has been filed in the name of the state on the relation of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall commence any such proceeding by application to the court for an order directing the pre-need seller to show cause why the commissioner should not have the relief prayed for in the application.

On the return of the order to show cause, and after a full hearing, the court shall either deny the application or grant the application, together with such other relief as the nature of the case and the interests of the prepaid contract purchaser, contract beneficiaries, or the public may require.

The commissioner may appoint one (1) or more special deputies, who have all the powers and responsibilities of the receiver granted under this section and the commissioner may employ such counsel, clerks and assistants as deemed necessary. The compensation of the special deputy, counsel, clerks and assistants, and all expenses of taking possession of the pre-need seller and of conducting the proceedings, shall be fixed by the commissioner, with the approval of the Davidson County chancery court, and shall be paid out of the funds or assets of the pre-need seller. The persons appointed under this subsection (d) shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.

The receiver may take such action as the receiver deems necessary or appropriate to reform and revitalize the pre-need seller. The receiver has all the powers of the owners and directors, whose authority shall be suspended, except as they are redelegated by the receiver. The receiver has full power to direct and manage, to hire and discharge any employees subject to any contractual rights they may have, and to deal with the property and business of the pre-need seller.

If it appears to the receiver that there has been criminal or tortious conduct, or breach of any contractual or fiduciary obligation detrimental to the pre-need seller by any owner, officer, director or other person, the receiver may pursue all appropriate legal remedies on behalf of the pre-need seller.

If the receiver determines that reorganization, consolidation, conversion, merger or other transformation of the pre-need seller is appropriate, the receiver shall prepare a plan to effect those changes. Upon application of the receiver for approval of the plan, and after such notice and hearings as the Davidson County chancery court may prescribe, the court may either approve or disapprove the plan proposed, or may modify it and approve it as modified. Any plan approved under this section shall be, in the judgment of the court, fair and equitable to all parties concerned. If the plan is approved, the receiver shall carry out the plan.

There is established within the general fund a pre-need funeral consumer protection account, referred to as the “pre-need funeral account” in this section. Funds received by the commissioner under this section, up to two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) or a higher amount as determined by the commissioner by rule, shall be deposited into the pre-need funeral account and held solely for the purposes related to the pre-need registration program and any receivership action initiated by the commissioner against a pre-need seller pursuant to this section.

Once the balance in the account exceeds two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) or a higher amount as determined by the commissioner by rule, an indigent fund shall be established within the general fund to be administered by the commissioner. Any funds received under this section by the commissioner which are in excess of such amount shall be deposited into the indigent fund. If the balance of the pre-need funeral account is reduced below such amount, no funds shall be deposited into the indigent fund until the pre-need funeral account balance is restored to such amount.

An indigent burial fund shall be established for the purpose of reimbursing funeral homes that provide funeral services to Tennessee residents who are indigent.

Funds shall only be expended for a person who was receiving state financial assistance on the date such indigent person died.

All funds in excess of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall remain available to be allocated and used solely for such indigent funerals provided by funeral homes.

Interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund shall be credited to such account, shall not revert to the general fund, and shall be carried forward into each subsequent fiscal year.

Moneys in the fund shall be invested in accordance with § 9-4-603.

The amount of reimbursement shall be based on available funds in the indigent burial fund at the time a request for reimbursement is filed by a funeral home.

A funeral home which provides funeral services to those Tennessee residents who are indigent may file an application with the commissioner, in a manner established by the commissioner, requesting reimbursement from the indigent burial fund for amounts expended by the funeral home in providing such services. The funeral home shall be required to file documentation verifying that the expenses were for providing such services and for no other purposes.

In accordance with the commissioner's rule-making authority pursuant to § 62-5-413(b), the commissioner shall promulgate rules defining indigency for purposes of eligibility for reimbursement, setting a maximum amount for reimbursement per burial, the manner in which claims shall be submitted and paid, and any other rules necessary for the proper administration of this program.

Moneys within the pre-need funeral account shall be invested by the state treasurer in accordance with § 9-4-603 for the sole benefit of the pre-need funeral account.

No pre-need registration renewal shall be issued unless the applicant pays, in addition to the renewal fee, a pre-need funeral consumer protection fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for every pre-need funeral sales contract entered into during the preceding renewal period. If the pre-need funeral sales contract covers both funeral merchandise and cemetery merchandise as defined in § 46-1-102, then a pre-need seller, other than a cemetery company paying a consumer protection fee for such a contract pursuant to § 46-1-105, shall pay only one (1) consumer protection fee for the contract, which shall be credited to the pre-need funeral account.

The funds received pursuant to this section shall be used to fund the pre-need registration program and any receivership action initiated by the commissioner against a pre-need seller to the extent the funds or assets of the pre-need seller are not adequate to fund the receivership.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the commissioner or the department or its employees or agents for any action taken by them in the performance of their power and duties under this section.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 15; 2010, ch. 933, § 1; 2016, ch. 911, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-415. Violations.

A violation of this part is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-416. Injunction.

In addition to other remedies, an action of injunction may be brought and maintained by the state or any other interested party to enjoin the violation of this part.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-417. Fraud — Treble damages.

In civil actions, in which the prevailing party proves fraud relative to a contract for future services under this part, the prevailing party shall receive treble damages together with attorneys' fees, costs and interest.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 9; 15 Tenn. Juris., §§ 16, 22.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).